hfst/pron-som-lex.txt
LEXICON Pronoun 
Personal ;
! Demonstrative ;
Reflexive ; 
Clit_pron ;
Quantity ; 
Indefinite_P ; 



! Convert these to some form that uses only anig- adig- 

LEXICON Personal
aniga+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg1:anig     Pronoun_case ; ! 1pSg
adiga+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg2:adig     Pronoun_case ; ! 2pSg
isaga+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg3M:isag Pronoun_case ; ! 3pSgMasc
iyada+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg3F:iyad  Pronoun_case ; ! 3pSgFem, 3pPl

anaga+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1Excl:anag     Pronoun_case ; ! 1pPl
annaga+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1Excl:annag     Pronoun_case ; ! 1pPl

inaga+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1Incl:inag     Pronoun_case ; ! 1pPl
innaga+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1Incl:innag     Pronoun_case ; ! 1pPl

idinka+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl2:idink   Pronoun_case ; ! 2pPl

iyaga+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl3:iyaga  Pronoun_case ; ! 3pSgFem, 3pPl


LEXICON Pronoun_case
+Nom:u		Clitics ;				! TEST:anigu,anigu
+Abs:a		Clitics ;				! TEST:aniga,aniga

! TODO: Move clitics elsewhere.
LEXICON Clitics
+CC:na  FINAL ;



LEXICON Clit_pron 
aan+Pron+Pers+Sg1:aan           FINAL ; ! 1pSg
aad+Pron+Pers+Sg2:aad           FINAL ; ! 2pSg
uu+Pron+Pers+Sg3M:uu         FINAL ; ! 3pSgMasc
ay+Pron+Pers+Sg3F:ay          FINAL ; ! 3pSgFem
aannu+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl:aannu   FINAL ; ! 1pSg Incl
aan+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl:aan       FINAL ; ! 1pSg Incl
aynu+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl:aynu     FINAL ; ! 1pSg Excl
aydin+Pron+Pers+Pl2:aydin       FINAL ; ! 2pPl
aad+Pron+Pers+Pl2:aad           FINAL ; ! 2pPl
ay+Pron+Pers+Pl3:ay             FINAL ; ! 3pPl

! Using these with waxa and other CS, so tags are shorter
LEXICON Clit_pron_short_tag
+Sg1:aan           FINAL ; ! 1pSg
+Sg2:aad           FINAL ; ! 2pSg
+Sg3M:uu         FINAL ; ! 3pSgMasc
+Sg3F:ay          FINAL ; ! 3pSgFem
+Pl1+Excl:aannu   FINAL ; ! 1pSg Incl
+Pl1+Incl:aan       FINAL ; ! 1pSg Incl
+Pl1+Incl:aynu     FINAL ; ! 1pSg Excl
+Pl2:aydin       FINAL ; ! 2pPl
+Pl2:aad           FINAL ; ! 2pPl
+Pl3:ay             FINAL ; ! 3pPl

! Saeed (1993) notes some pre-conjunction pronouns too. Need to see these in use.
! an     1pSg
! ad     2pSg
! is     3pSgM
! iya    3pSgF
! anna   1pPlExcl
! inna   1pPlIncl
! idin   2pPl
! iya    3pPl


! LEXICON Demonstrative
! FINAL ;

LEXICON Reflexive
is+Refl:is FINAL ;


! LEXICON Obj_Pron_2
! kay 1pSgObj2/IO
! kaa 2pSg
! kayo 1pPlExcl
! keen 1pPlIncl
! kiin 2pPl
! no 3p

! Wáy igá kíin qaadeen
! Waa-ay i-ká kíin qaadeen
! They took me away from you.

! N ? ?		cidna		"no-one"
! N ? ? 		cidina		"no-one, +Subj marking with negative verbs"
! waxba 		"nothing"

! Finnish: kukaan+Pron+Qnt+Sg+Nom

LEXICON Quantity
waxba+Pron+Qnt+Sg+Abs:waxba		FINAL 	"nothing" ;
cidna+Pron+Qnt+Sg+Abs:cidna		FINAL	"no-one" ;
cidina+Pron+Qnt+Sg+Nom:cidina		FINAL	"no-one" ;


LEXICON Indefinite_P
wax+Pron+Indef+Abs:wax FINAL ; 
